trunk/incubator/da.olddic.dix
    <pardef n="hjem__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kat__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aren</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="høn/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sadisme__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="år__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/arn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnet</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørnene</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ø__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oen</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øerne</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øer</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="søn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aft/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enen</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enerne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ener</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nen</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="abeka"><i>abeka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angoraka"><i>angoraka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bi"><i>bi</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blækha"><i>blækha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blåha"><i>blåha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bølleha"><i>bølleha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bruskha"><i>bruskha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cylinderha"><i>cylinderha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dameha"><i>dameha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filtha"><i>filtha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanka"><i>hanka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="havka"><i>havka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huska"><i>huska</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="majka"><i>majka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mareka"><i>mareka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="misseka"><i>misseka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="napoleonsha"><i>napoleonsha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paddeha"><i>paddeha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panamaha"><i>panamaha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parasolha"><i>parasolha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ridderha"><i>ridderha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørha"><i>rørha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sangska"><i>sangska</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siameserka"><i>siameserka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skælha"><i>skælha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ska"><i>ska</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skørha"><i>skørha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skva"><i>skva</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slørha"><i>slørha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sni"><i>sni</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spo"><i>spo</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stormha"><i>stormha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stråha"><i>stråha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i>su</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svovlha"><i>svovlha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tamka"><i>tamka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tragtha"><i>tragtha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyrolerha"><i>tyrolerha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vildka"><i>vildka</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
